Idaho, session 2026, H0830.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 37-2705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2705. SCHEDULE I. (a) The controlled substances listed in this sec-
tion are included in schedule I.
(b) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters,
ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless specifically
excepted, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts
is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-pip-
eridinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);
(2) Acetylmethadol;
(3) Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylac-
etamide);
(4) Acryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacry-
lamide);
(5) Allylprodine;
(6) Alphacetylmethadol (except levo-alphacetylmethadol also known as
levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate or LAAM);
(7) Alphameprodine;
(8) Alphamethadol;
(9) Alpha'-methyl butyryl fentanyl (2-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidi-
n-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide);
(10) Alpha-methylfentanyl;
(11) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(12) Benzethidine;
(13) Betacetylmethadol;
(14) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperid-
inyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(15) Beta-hydroxythiofentanyl;
(16) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-
methyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
(17) Betameprodine;
(18) Betamethadol;
(19) Beta-methyl fentanyl;
(20) Beta'-phenyl fentanyl;


(21) Betaprodine;
(22) Brorphine (1-(1-(1-(4-Bromophenyl)ethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-1,3-
dihydro-2H-benzo[D]imidazol-2-one);
(23) Butonitazene (2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1hbenzimida-
zol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine);
(24) Clonitazene;
(25) Crotonyl fentanyl ((E)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyl-
but-2-enamide);
(26) Cyclopentyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcy-
clopentanecarboxamide);
(27) Cyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcy-
clopropanecarboxamide);
(28) Dextromoramide;
(29) Diampromide;
(30) Diethylthiambutene;
(31) Difenoxin;
(32) Dimenoxadol;
(33) Dimepheptanol;
(34) 2',5'-Dimethoxyfentanyl (N-(1-(2,5-dimethoxyphenethyl)piperi-
din-4-yl)-N-phenylpropionamide);
(35) Dimethylthiambutene;
(36) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
(37) Dipipanone;
(38) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
(39) Etodesnitazene; Etazene (2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1hbenzimida-
zol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine);
(40) Etonitazene;
(41) Etoxeridine;
(42) Fentanyl-related substances. "Fentanyl-related substances"
means any substance not otherwise listed and for which no exemption or
approval is in effect under section 505 of the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. 355, and that is structurally related to fen-
tanyl by one (1) or more of the following modifications:
i. Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl group by any
monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the monocy-
cle;
ii. Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with alkyl, alkenyl,
alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino, or nitro groups;
iii. Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with alkyl,
alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino,
or nitro groups;
iv. Replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic monocycle,
whether or not further substituted in or on the aromatic monocy-
cle; and/or
v. Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another acyl group;
(43) Fentanyl carabamate;
(44) Flunitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-fluorobenzyl)-5-nitro-1h-ben-
zimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(45) 4-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide);


(46) 2'-fluoro ortho-fluorofentanyl;
(47) Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfu-
ran-2-carboxamide);
(48) 3-Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfu-
ran-3-carboxamide);
(49) Furethidine;
(50) Hydroxypethidine;
(51) Isobutyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylisobutyramide);
(52) Isovalery fentanyl (3-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylbutanimide);
(53) Isotonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4isopropoxybenzyl)-5-ni-
tro-1h-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(54) Ketobemidone;
(55) Levomoramide;
(56) Levophenacylmorphan;
(57) Meta-fluorofentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperi-
din-4-yl)isobutyramide);
(58) Meta-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide);
(59) Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
yl)-N-phenylacetamide);
(60) 2-Methyl AP-237 (1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1-yl)piper-
azin-1-yl)butan-1-one);
(61) 4'-methyl acetyl fentanyl;
(62) 3-Methylfentanyl;
(63) 3-methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-pip-
eridinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(64) Metodesnitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-1h-benzim-
idazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(65) Metonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-
1hbenzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(66) Morpheridine;
(67) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
(68) MT-45 (1-cyclohexyl-4- (1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine);
(69) N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperdin-4-yl)Isobutyramide
(para-chloroisobutyrl fentanyl);
(70) Noracymethadol;
(71) Norlevorphanol;
(72) Normethadone;
(73) Norpipanone;
(74) N-pyrrolidino etonitazene (2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2-
(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)1hbenzimidazole);
(75) Ocfentanil (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethyl-
piperidin-4-yl)acetamide);
(76) Ortho-fluoroacryl fentanyl;
(77) Ortho-fluorobutyrl fentanyl;
(78) Ortho-fluorofentanyl;
(79) Ortho-fluorofuranyl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide);


(80) Ortho-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl;
(81) Ortho-methyl acetylfentanyl;
(82) Ortho-methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl;
(83) Para-chloroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) isobutyramide);
(84) Para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) butyramide);
(85) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-
piperidinyl] propanamide);
(86) Para-fluoro furanyl fentanyl;
(87) Para-methoxybutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) butyramide);
(88) Para-methoxyfuranyl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide);
(89) Para-methylcyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-
phenylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide);
(90) Para-methylfentanyl;
(91) PEPAP (1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);
(92) Phenadoxone;
(93) Phenampromide;
(94) Phenomorphan;
(95) Phenoperidine;
(96) Phenyl fentanyl;
(97) Piritramide;
(98) Proheptazine;
(99) Properidine;
(100) Propiram;
(101) Protonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4-propoxyben-
zyl)-1h-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine);
(102) Racemoramide;
(103) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidine-4-yl)-N-
phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide);
(104) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-
propanamide);
(105) Tilidine;
(106) Trimeperidine;
(107) u-47700 (3,4-Dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-
methylbenzamide);
(108) Valeryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyl-
pentanamide);
(109) Zipeprol (1-methoxy-3-[4-(2-methoxy-2-phenylethyl)piper-
azin-1-yl]-1-phenylpropan-2-ol).
(c) Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers and
salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of
these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
(1) Acetorphine;
(2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
(3) Benzylmorphine;
(4) Codeine methylbromide;


(5) Codeine-N-Oxide;
(6) Cyprenorphine;
(7) Desomorphine;
(8) Dihydromorphine;
(9) Drotebanol;
(10) Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);
(11) Heroin;
(12) Hydromorphinol;
(13) Methyldesorphine;
(14) Methyldihydromorphine;
(15) Morphine methylbromide;
(16) Morphine methylsulfonate;
(17) Morphine-N-Oxide;
(18) Myrophine;
(19) Nicocodeine;
(20) Nicomorphine;
(21) Normorphine;
(22) Pholcodine;
(23) Thebacon.
(d) Hallucinogenic substances. Any material, compound, mixture or
preparation that contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic
substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless specifically
excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of iso-
mers is possible within the specific chemical designation (for purposes of
this subsection only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, position and
geometric isomers):
(1) Dimethoxyphenethylamine, or any compound not specifically
excepted or listed in another schedule that can be formed from
dimethoxyphenethylamine by replacement of one (1) or more hydrogen
atoms with another atom(s), functional group(s) or substructure(s)
including, but not limited to, compounds such as DOB, DOC, 2C-B,
25B-NBOMe;
(2) Methoxyamphetamine or any compound not specifically excepted or
listed in another schedule that can be formed from methoxyamphetamine
by replacement of one (1) or more hydrogen atoms with another atom(s),
functional group(s) or substructure(s) including, but not limited to,
compounds such as PMA and DOM;
(3) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;
(4) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine;
(5) Amphetamine or methamphetamine with a halogen substitution on the
benzyl ring, including compounds such as fluorinated amphetamine and
fluorinated methamphetamine;
(6) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
(7) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);
(8) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as N-et-
hyl-alpha-methyl-3,4 (methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, and N-et-
hyl MDA, MDE, MDEA);
(9) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as N-hyd-
roxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, and N-hyd-
roxy MDA);


(10) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
(11) 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (also known as 5-methoxy-3-2[2-
(dimethylamino)ethyl]indole and 5-MeO-DMT);
(12) Alpha-ethyltryptamine (some other names: etryptamine, 3-(2-am-
inobutyl) indole);
(13) Alpha-methyltryptamine;
(14) Bufotenine;
(15) Diethyltryptamine (DET);
(16) Dimethyltryptamine (DMT);
(17) Ibogaine;
(18) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(19) Marihuana;
(20) Mescaline;
(21) Methoxetamine;
(22) Parahexyl;
(23) Peyote;
(24) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(25) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(26) Para-methoxymethamphetamine (PMMA), 1-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-
methylpropan-2-amine;
(27) Psilocybin;
(28) Psilocyn;
(29) Tetrahydrocannabinols or synthetic equivalents of the substances
contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp.
and/or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with simi-
lar chemical structure such as the following:
i. Tetrahydrocannabinols, except for the permitted amount of
tetrahydrocannabinol found in industrial hemp, or nabiximols in a
drug product approved by the United States food and drug adminis-
tration:
a. ∆ 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their opti-
cal isomers, excluding dronabinol in sesame oil and encapsu-
lated in either a soft gelatin capsule or in an oral solution
in a drug product approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Adminis-
tration.
b. ∆ 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers.
c. ∆ 3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical
isomers. (Since nomenclature of these substances is not in-
ternationally standardized, compounds of these structures,
regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions are
covered.)
d. [(6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2methy-
loctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-
1-o1)], also known as 6aR-trans-3-(1,1-dimethylhep-
tyl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydro-1-hydroxy-6,6-dimethyl-6H-
dibenzo[b,d]pyran-9-methanol (HU-210) and its geometric
isomers (HU211 or dexanabinol).
ii. The following synthetic drugs:


a. Any compound structurally derived from (1H-indole-3-
yl)(cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl)methanone, or (1H-in-
dole-3-yl)(cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl)methane, or
(1H-indole-3-yl)(cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl), methyl
or dimethyl butanoate, amino-methyl (or dimethyl)-1-oxobu-
tan-2-yl) carboxamide by substitution at the nitrogen atoms
of the indole ring or carboxamide to any extent, whether or
not further substituted in or on the indole ring to any ex-
tent, whether or not substituted to any extent in or on the
cycloalkyl, cycloalkenyl, aryl ring(s) (substitution in the
ring may include, but is not limited to, heteroatoms such as
nitrogen, sulfur and oxygen).
b. N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluo-
ropentyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide (5F-AB-PINACA).
c. 1-(1.3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)-pentan-1-one
(N-ethylpentylone, ephylone).
d. 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1 H-inda-
zole-3-carboxamide (4-cn-cumyl-BUTINACA).
e. 5-pentyl-2-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)pyrido[4,3-b]indol-1-
one (Cumyl PeGACLONE).
f. Ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3carboxam-
ido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate * (5F-EDMB-PINACA).
g. Ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-
3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-EDMB-PICA).
h. (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3tetram-
ethylcyclopropyl)methanone ( FUB-144).
i. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-inda-
zole-3-carboxamide (5f-cumyl-pinaca; SGT-25).
j. (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1
H-pyrrolo[2.3-B]pyridine-3-carboxamide(5fcumyl-P7AICA).
k. FUB-AMB, MMB- FUBINACA (Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluoroben-
zyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate.
l. MMB-FUBICA (Methyl 2-(1-(4-Fluorobenzyl)-1H-Indole-3-
carboxamido)-3-methyl butanoate).
m. Methyl 3,3-dimethyl-2-((1-(pent-4-en-1-yl)-1H-inda-
zol-3-yl)formamido)butanoate (MDMB-4EN-PINACA).
n. Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3-methylbutanoate (MMB-CHMICA, AMB-CHMICA).
o. Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (MDMB-CHMICA).
p. Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxam-
ido-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (MDMB-FUBINACA).
q. Methyl 2-[[1-(4-Fluorobutyl)Indole-3-Carbonyl]Amino]-
3,3-Dimethyl-Butanoate (4F-MDMB-BUTICA).
r. Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-MDMBPICA).
s. Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-ADB, 5FMDMB-PINACA).
t. Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxam-
ido)-3-methylbutanoate (5FAMB).


u. N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-butyl-1H-
Indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-BUTINACA).
v. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluo-
robenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-FUBINACA).
w. N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(pent-4-
en-1-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-4EN-PINACA).
x. N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide (FUB-AKB48; FUB-APINACA).
y. N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide (5F-APINACA, 5F-AKB48).
z. N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)1-(Cyclohexyl-
methyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (AB-CHMINACA).
aa. Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-car-
boxylate (NM2201; CBL2201).
bb. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naph-
thoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not further sub-
stituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
cc. Any compound structurally derived from 1-(1-naphthyl-
methyl)indene by substitution at the 3-position of the in-
dene ring to any extent, whether or not further substituted
in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
dd. Any compound structurally derived from 3-pheny-
lacetylindole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring to any extent, whether or not further substi-
tuted in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not sub-
stituted in the phenyl ring to any extent.
ee. Any compound structurally derived from 2-(3-hydroxy-
cyclohexyl)phenol by substitution at the 5-position of the
phenolic ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in
the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
ff. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(benzoyl)in-
dole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of
the indole ring to any extent, whether or not further sub-
stituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent.
gg. [2,3-dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinyl-
methyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-
napthalenylmethanone (WIN-55,212-2).
hh. 3-dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxyhexahydrocannabinol (HU-
243).
ii. [(6S, 6aR, 9R, 10aR)-9-hydroxy-6-methyl-3-[(2R)-
5-phenylpentan-2-yl]oxy-5,6,6a,7,8,9,10,10a-octahy-
drophenanthridin-1-yl]acetate (CP 50,5561).
(30) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine: N-ethyl-1-phenylcy-
clohexylamine (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcy-
clohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE;


(31) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine: 1-(phenylcyclohexyl) -
pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;
(32) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine 1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-
piperidine, 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine, TPCP, TCP;
(33) Thiofuranyl fentanyl;
(34) 1-[1-(2-thienyl) cyclohexyl] pyrrolidine another name: TCPy;
(35) Spores or mycelium capable of producing mushrooms that contain
psilocybin or psilocin.
(e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule,
any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity
of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central ner-
vous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the
specific chemical designation:
(1) Clonazolam;
(2) Diclazepam;
(3) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid (some other names include GHB; gam-
ma-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hyroxybutanoic acid; sod-
ium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate);
(4) Etizolam;
(5) Flualprazolam;
(6) Flubromazolam;
(7) Flunitrazepam (also known as R2, Rohypnol);
(8) Mecloqualone;
(9) Methaqualone.
(f) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in an-
other schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which con-
tains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on
the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of iso-
mers:
(1) Amineptine (7-[(10,11-dihydro-5H-dibenzo[a,d]cyclohepten-5-
yl)amino]heptanoic acid);
(2) Aminorex (some other names: aminoxaphen, 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-ox-
azoline, or 4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine), 4,4'-dimethylam-
inorex (4,4'-DMAR; 4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-2-oxazo-
lamine) or (4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);
(3) Cathinone (some other names: 2-amino-1-phenol-1-propanone, alp-
ha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone);
(4) Substituted cathinones. Any compound, except bupropion or com-
pounds listed under a different schedule, structurally derived from
2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either
phenyl, naphthyl or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound
is further modified in any of the following ways:
i. By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl,
alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl or halide sub-
stituents, whether or not further substituted in the ring system
by one (1) or more other univalent substituents;
ii. By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl sub-
stituent;


iii. By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl,
dialkyl, benzyl or methoxybenzyl groups, or by inclusion of the
2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure.
(5) Alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone* (PV8);
(6) Alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone* (A-PHP);
(7) 4-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone* (4chloro-a-pvp);
(8) Eutylone (1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)butan-1-one);
(9) Fenethylline;
(10) Mesocarb (N-phenyl-N'-(3-(1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1,2,3-oxadia-
zol-3-ium-5-yl)carbamimidate);
(11) Methcathinone (some other names: 2-(methyl-amino)-propioph-
enone, alpha-(methylamino)-propiophenone, N-methylcathinone, AL-
464, AL-422, AL-463 and UR1423);
(12) Methiopropamine (N-methyl-1-(thiophen-2-yl)propan-2-amine);
(13) (+/-)cis-4-methylaminorex [(+/-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-meth-
yl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine];
(14) 4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone* (4-MEAP);
(15) 4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone* (MPHP);
(16) 2-(methylamino)-1-(3-methylphenyl)propan-1-one (3-MMC);
(17) 4-methyl-1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidine-1-yl)pent-1-one) (ALPHA-
PIHP);
(18) N-benzylpiperazine (also known as: BZP, 1-benzylpiperazine);
(19) N-ethylamphetamine;
(20) N-ethylhexedrone*;
(21) N,N-dimethylamphetamine (also known as: N,N-alpha-trimethyl-
benzeneethanamine).
(g) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule,
any alkaloids found in or derived from Mitragyna speciosa, including syn-
thetic alkaloids, homologs, analogs, isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, when the existence of the isomers, es-
ters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designa-
tion.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.